Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska7-205
Board; chairperson; meetings; expenses.

The board shall select one of its members to be chairperson. The board shall meet as necessary to carry out its duties, but shall meet at least annually. The members shall serve without compensation but shall be reimbursed for expenses as provided in sections 81-1174 to 81-1177.

Laws 2008, LB1014, § 23;

Laws 2020, LB381, § 14.